Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 3. Guardians of Incapacitated Persons.
Sec. 13.26.311.
Who may be guardian; priorities.

The court may appoint a competent person, including a private professional guardian, or the public guardian, as the guardian of an incapacitated person.

The court may not appoint a person to be a guardian of an incapacitated person if the person

provides, or is likely to provide during the guardianship period, substantial services to the incapacitated person in a professional or business capacity, other than in the capacity as guardian;

is, or is likely to become during the guardianship period, a creditor of the incapacitated person, other than in the capacity as guardian;

has, or is likely to have during the guardianship period, interests that may conflict with those of the incapacitated person; or

is employed by a person who would be disqualified under (1) — (3) of this subsection.

A person may be appointed as the guardian of an incapacitated person notwithstanding the provisions of (b) of this section if the person is the spouse, adult child, parent, or sibling of the incapacitated person and the court determines that the potential conflict of interest is insubstantial and that the appointment would clearly be in the best interests of the incapacitated person. When appointing a relative or friend of the incapacitated person as the guardian of an incapacitated person, the court shall require that the proposed guardian complete one hour of mandatory education on the basics of guardianship before the appointment or within 30 days after the appointment.

Subject to (e) and (f) of this section, qualified persons have priority for appointment as guardian in the following order:

an individual or organization nominated by the incapacitated person if, at the time of the nomination, the incapacitated person had, in the opinion of the court, sufficient mental capacity to make an informed choice;

the spouse of the incapacitated person;

an adult child or parent of the incapacitated person;

a relative of the incapacitated person with whom the incapacitated person has resided for more than six months during the year before the filing of the petition;

a relative or friend who has demonstrated a sincere, longstanding interest in the welfare of the incapacitated person;

a private professional guardian;

the public guardian.

When more than one person has equal priority under (d) of this section, the court shall select the person it considers to be the best qualified.

When in the best interest of the incapacitated person, a court may decline to appoint a person who has priority under (d) of this section as guardian of an incapacitated person and may appoint as guardian a person who has a lower priority than another person or who does not have a priority. If the court appoints a person with a lower priority under (d) of this section than another person, the court shall make appropriate written findings related to why the best interests of the respondent require appointment of the person with a lower priority.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 13 ch 83 SLA 1981; am §§ 14 — 18 ch 84 SLA 2004; am § 20 ch 53 SLA 2008)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.145

; renumbered in 2016.

Sec. 13.26.315.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.575.]

Sec. 13.26.316.
General powers and duties of guardian.

A guardian shall diligently and in good faith carry out the specific duties and powers assigned by the court. In carrying out duties and powers, the guardian shall encourage the ward to participate to the maximum extent of the ward’s capacity in all decisions that affect the ward, to act on the ward’s own behalf in all matters in which the ward is able, and to develop or regain, to the maximum extent possible, the capacity to meet the essential requirements for physical health or safety, to protect the ward’s rights, and to manage the ward’s financial resources.

A partial guardian of an incapacitated person has only the powers and duties respecting the ward enumerated in the court order.

A full guardian of an incapacitated person has the same powers and duties respecting the ward that a parent has respecting an unemancipated minor child except that the guardian is not liable for the care and maintenance of the ward and is not liable, solely by reason of the guardianship, to a person who is harmed by acts of the ward. Except as modified by order of the court, a full guardian’s powers and duties include, but are not limited to, the following:

the guardian is entitled to custody of the person of the ward and shall assure that the ward has a place of abode in the least restrictive setting consistent with the essential requirements for the ward’s physical health and safety;

the guardian shall assure the care, comfort, and maintenance of the ward;

the guardian shall assure that the ward receives the services necessary to meet the essential requirements for the ward’s physical health and safety and to develop or regain, to the maximum extent possible, the capacity to meet the ward’s needs for physical health and safety;

the guardian shall assure through the initiation of court action and other means that the ward enjoys all personal, civil, and human rights to which the ward is entitled;

the guardian may give consents or approvals necessary to enable the ward to receive medical or other professional care, counsel, treatment, or services except as otherwise limited by (e) of this section;

the guardian has the powers and duties of a conservator under this chapter; however, the guardian may not apply the ward’s money or property for the services as guardian or for room and board that the guardian or the guardian’s spouse, parent, or child has furnished the ward unless, before payment, the court finds that the ward is financially able to pay and that the charge is reasonable; notice of a request for payment approval shall be provided to at least one relative of the ward if possible; the guardian shall exercise care to conserve any excess money or property for the ward’s needs;

if a conservator of the estate of the ward has also been appointed, the guardian shall pay all of the ward’s estate received by the guardian to the conservator for management as provided in AS

13.26.401

—

13.26.575

.

A guardian of a ward, for whom a conservator has also been appointed, shall have the custody and care of the ward and is entitled to receive reasonable sums for services and for room and board furnished to the ward as agreed upon between the guardian and the conservator. The guardian may request the conservator to expend the ward’s estate for the ward’s care and maintenance.

A guardian may not

place the ward in a facility or institution for the mentally ill other than through a formal commitment proceeding under AS 47.30 in which the ward has a separate guardian ad litem;

consent on behalf of the ward to an abortion, sterilization, psychosurgery, or removal of bodily organs except when necessary to preserve the life or prevent serious impairment of the physical health of the ward;

consent on behalf of the ward to the withholding of lifesaving medical procedures; however, a guardian is not required to oppose the cessation or withholding of lifesaving medical procedures when those procedures will serve only to prolong the dying process and offer no reasonable expectation of effecting a temporary or permanent cure of or relief from the illness or condition being treated unless the ward has clearly stated that lifesaving medical procedures not be withheld; a guardian is not civilly liable for acts or omissions under this paragraph unless the act or omission constitutes gross negligence or reckless or intentional misconduct;

consent on behalf of the ward to the performance of an experimental medical procedure or to participation in a medical experiment not intended to preserve the life or prevent serious impairment of the physical health of the ward;

consent on behalf of the ward to termination of the ward’s parental rights;

prohibit the ward from registering to vote or from casting a ballot at public election;

prohibit the ward from applying for and obtaining a driver’s license;

prohibit the marriage or divorce of the ward.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 28 ch 56 SLA 1973; am § 14 ch 83 SLA 1981; am § 1 ch 126 SLA 1986; am § 19 ch 84 SLA 2004)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.150

; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.401

—

13.26.575

” was substituted for “AS

13.26.165

—

13.26.315

”.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The judicial determination of unsoundness of mind necessary to disqualify a mentally impaired individual from voting must be specifically raised in a guardianship hearing or raised in a separate proceeding. Division personnel initiate such a proceeding. However, in the absence of implementing regulations, it is unlikely that the division would choose to do so. August 28, 1992 Op. Att’y Gen.

Secs. 13.26.320, 13.26.324.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.580 and 13.26.595.]

Secs. 13.26.325, 13.26.330.
Death or disability. [Repealed, § 3 ch 109 SLA 1988.]

Secs. 13.26.332 — 13.26.353.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.645 — 13.26.680.]

Secs. 13.26.356, 13.26.358.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.625 and 13.26.630.]

Secs. 13.26.360 — 13.26.400.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.700 — 13.26.740.]